Utah statutes.
4-12-6.   Enforcement -- Inspection and samples authorized -- Methods for sampling and analysis prescribed -- Results to be forwarded to registrant or permittee -- Warrants.

(1)  The department shall periodically sample, inspect, analyze, and test commercial feeds distributed within this state and may enter any public or private premises or vehicle for the purpose of determining compliance with this chapter. It may also in conjunction with such activities inspect records to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2)  Methods for sampling and for analyses of feed ingredients, mineral ingredients, or other ingredients, or analyses of commercial feed mixtures (customer-formula feeds) shall be made in accordance with methods published by the Association of Official Analytical Chemists or other generally recognized methods.

(3)  The department shall be guided by the official sample in determining whether a commercial feed is misbranded, adulterated, or otherwise deficient.

(4)  The results of all tests of official samples shall be forwarded by the department to the registrant or permittee, as the case may be, to the address specified on the container, label, or on the written statement or invoice. In addition, the department shall furnish to the registrant or permittee part of any official sample which it determines is misbranded or adulterated upon written request to the department made by the registrant within 30 days after receipt of the unsatisfactory test results.

(5)  The department may proceed immediately, if admittance is refused, to obtain an ex parte warrant from the nearest court of competent jurisdiction to allow entry upon the premises for the purpose of making inspections and obtaining samples.

